src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-aeqbtwks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äbțõks: # Noun 208 'eng /est vahend/fin' - full paradigm
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Nom: äbțõks
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Gen: äbțõks
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Par: äbțõkst
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Dat: äbțõksõn
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Ins: äbțõksõks
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Ill: äbțõksõ
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Ela: äbțõksõst
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Nom: äbțõkst
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Gen: äbțõkst
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Par: äbțõkši
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Dat: äbțõkstõn
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Ins: äbțõkstõks
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Ill: äbțõkšiz
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Ela: äbțõkšist
